Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,151
Amendment before issuance of shares.

(MBCA 10.02) If a corporation
has not yet issued shares, its board of directors or its incorporators if
it has no board of directors may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation's
articles of incorporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 151.